Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB599.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 337.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Workplace
Standards under the direction and supervision of the secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(b) "Department" means the Department of Workplace Standards in the
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(c) 1. "Wages" includes any compensation due to an employee by reason of
his or her employment, including salaries, commissions, vested vacation
pay, overtime pay, severance or dismissal pay, earned bonuses, and any
other similar advantages agreed upon by the employer and the employee
or provided to employees as an established policy. The wages shall be
payable in legal tender of the United States, checks on banks, direct
deposits, or payroll card accounts convertible into cash on demand at
full face value, subject to the allowances made in this chapter. However,
an employee may not be charged an activation fee and the payroll card
account shall provide the employee with the ability, without charge, to
make at least one (1) withdrawal per pay period for any amount up to
and including the full account balance.
2. For the purposes of calculating hourly wage rates for scheduled
overtime for professional firefighters, as defined in KRS 95A.210(8),
"wages" shall not include the distribution to qualified professional
firefighters by local governments of supplements received from the
Firefighters Foundation Program Fund. For the purposes of calculating
hourly wage rates for unscheduled overtime for professional firefighters,
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
as defined in KRS 95A.210(9), "wages" shall include the distribution to
qualified professional firefighters by local governments of supplements
received from the Firefighters Foundation Program Fund;
(d) "Employer" is any person, either individual, corporation, partnership, agency,
or firm who employs an employee and includes any person, either individual,
corporation, partnership, agency, or firm acting directly or indirectly in the
interest of an employer in relation to an employee; and
(e) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for
an employer, except that:
1. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the
United States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee
nor a franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the
franchisor for any purpose under this chapter; and
2. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the
United States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor
nor a franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the
franchisee for any purpose under this chapter.
For purposes of this paragraph, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same
meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1.
(2) As used in KRS 337.275 to 337.325, 337.345, and 337.385 to 337.405, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(a) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for
an employer, but shall not include:
1. Any individual employed in agriculture;
2. Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative,
supervisory, or professional capacity, or in the capacity of outside
salesperson[salesman], or as an outside collector as the terms are
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
defined by administrative regulations of the commissioner;
3. Any individual employed by the United States;
4. Any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private
home. The provisions of this section shall include individuals employed
in domestic service in or about the home of an employer where there is
more than one (1) domestic servant regularly employed;
5. [Any individual classified and given a certificate by the commissioner
showing a status of learner, apprentice, worker with a disability,
sheltered workshop employee, and student under administrative
procedures and administrative regulations prescribed and promulgated
by the commissioner. This certificate shall authorize employment at the
wages, less than the established fixed minimum fair wage rates, and for
the period of time fixed by the commissioner and stated in the certificate
issued to the person;
6. ]Employees of retail stores, service industries, hotels, motels, and
restaurant operations whose average annual gross volume of sales made
for business done is less than ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) for
the five (5) preceding years exclusive of excise taxes at the retail level
or if the employee is the parent, spouse, child, or other member of his or
her employer's immediate family;
6[7]. Any individual employed as a baby-sitter in an employer's home, or an
individual employed as a companion by a sick, convalescing, or elderly
person or by the person's immediate family, to care for that sick,
convalescing, or elderly person and whose principal duties do not
include housekeeping;
7[8]. Any individual engaged in the delivery of newspapers to the consumer;
8[9]. Any individual subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 7, 16, 27A,
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
30A, and 18A provided that the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall
have the authority to prescribe by administrative regulation those
emergency employees, or others, who shall receive overtime pay rates
necessary for the efficient operation of government and the protection of
affected employees;
9[10]. Any employee employed by an establishment which is an
organized nonprofit camp, religious, or nonprofit educational conference
center, if it does not operate for more than two hundred ten (210) days in
any calendar year;
10[11]. Any employee whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour
residential care on the employer's premises in a parental role to children
who are primarily dependent, neglected, and abused and who are in the
care of private, nonprofit childcaring facilities licensed by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services under KRS 199.640 to 199.670;
11[12]. Any individual whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour
residential care in his or her own home as a family caregiver, family
home provider, or adult foster care provider and who is approved to
provide family caregiver services to an adult with a disability through a
contractual relationship with a community board for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability established under KRS
210.370 to 210.460 or through a contractual relationship with a certified
waiver provider as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), or is certified or
licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to provide adult
foster care;
12[13]. A direct seller as defined in Section 3508(b)(2) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; or
13[14]. Any individual whose function is to provide behavior support
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
services, behavior programming services, case management services,
community living support services, positive behavior support services,
or respite services through a contractual relationship with a certified
waiver provider, as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), pursuant to a
1915(c) home and community based services waiver program, as
defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(2);
(b) "Agriculture" means farming in all its branches, including cultivation and
tillage of the soil; dairying; production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting
of any agricultural or horticultural commodity; raising of livestock, bees,
furbearing animals, or poultry; and any practice, including any forestry or
lumbering operations, performed on a farm in conjunction with farming
operations, including preparation and delivery of produce to storage, to
market, or to carriers for transportation to market;
(c) "Gratuity" means voluntary monetary contribution received by an employee
from a guest, patron, or customer for services rendered;
(d) "Tipped employee" means any employee engaged in an occupation in which
he or she customarily and regularly receives more than thirty dollars ($30) per
month in tips;[ and]
(e) "U.S.C." means the United States Code; and
(f) "Worker with a disability" means an individual whose earning or
productive capacity is impaired by age, physical or mental deficiency, or
injury for the work he or she performs.
Section 2. KRS 337.275 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as may otherwise be provided by this chapter, every employer shall
pay to each of his or her employees wages at a rate of not less than five
dollars and eighty-five cents ($5.85) an hour beginning on June 26, 2007, not
less than six dollars and fifty-five cents ($6.55) an hour beginning July 1,
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
2008, and not less than seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25) an hour
beginning July 1, 2009.
(b) Every employer shall pay to each of his or her workers with a disability,
wages at a rate of not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the state
minimum wage beginning July 1, 2026, not less than eighty percent (80%)
of the state minimum wage beginning July 1, 2027, and not less than one
hundred percent (100%) of the state minimum wage beginning July 1, 2028.
Beginning July 1, 2028, an employer who is authorized to employ workers
with a disability at a rate less than the federal minimum wage pursuant to
29 U.S.C. sec. 214(c) shall not employ workers with a disability at a rate
lower than the municipality, county, or state minimum wage or the
prevailing wage as defined in 29 C.F.R. sec. 1.2.
(c) If the federal minimum hourly wage as prescribed by 29 U.S.C. sec. 206(a)(1)
is increased in excess of the minimum hourly wage in effect under this
subsection, the minimum hourly wage under this subsection shall be increased
to the same amount, effective on the same date as the federal minimum hourly
wage rate. If the state minimum hourly wage is increased to the federal
minimum hourly wage, it shall include only the federal minimum hourly rate
prescribed in 29 U.S.C. sec. 206(a)(1) and shall not include other wage rates
or conditions, exclusions, or exceptions to the federal minimum hourly wage
rate. In addition, the increase to the federal minimum hourly wage rate does
not extend or modify the scope or coverage of the minimum wage rate
required under this chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, for any employee
engaged in an occupation in which he or she customarily and regularly receives
more than thirty dollars ($30) per month in tips from patrons or others, the
employer may pay as a minimum not less than the hourly wage rate required to be
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
paid a tipped employee under the federal minimum hourly wage law as prescribed
by 29 U.S.C. sec. 203. The employer shall establish by his or her records that for
each week where credit is taken, when adding tips received to wages paid, not less
than the minimum rate prescribed in 29 U.S.C. sec. 203 was received by the
employee. No employer shall use all or part of any tips or gratuities received by
employees toward the payment of the statutory minimum hourly wage as required
by 29 U.S.C. sec. 203. Nothing, however, shall prevent employees from entering
into an agreement to divide tips or gratuities among themselves.
Section 3. KRS 337.295 is amended to read as follows:
Administrative regulations issued by the commissioner under KRS 337.275 to 337.325,
337.345, and 337.385 to 337.405 may include[,] but are not limited to[,] regulations
defining and governing bona fide executive, administrative, or professional employees;
[regulations governing learners, apprentices, workers with disabilities, sheltered
workshop employees, and students, ]regulations governing outside
salesperson[salesmen]; bonuses; part-time rates; special pay for special or extra work;
allowances as part of the wage rates applicable under KRS 337.275 for board, lodging,
and gratuities; other facilities or services furnished by employers and used by employees;
and other special items usual in a particular employer-employee relationship.
Section 4. KRS 205.5605 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 205.5605 to 205.5607, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Budget allowance" means the amount of money made available each month to a
consumer to purchase covered services and supports. The amount of money shall
not exceed the amount that would have been allocated in the traditional Medicaid
program for nonresidential and nonmedical services for the consumer;
(2) "Consumer" means a person who has chosen to participate in the program, has met
the enrollment requirements, has a person-centered plan, and has received an
approved budget allowance;
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
(3) "Covered services and supports" means:
(a) Those services and supports that are eligible for reimbursement under the
program and that are approved for the consumer following a functional needs
assessment and pursuant to a person-centered plan; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2028, does not include services and supports utilized to
refer a consumer to or secure new employment for a consumer in a
sheltered workshop where consumers are paid less than minimum wage;
(4) "Fiscal intermediary" means an entity that is approved by the cabinet to provide
service that helps the consumer manage his or her budget allowance, retains the
funds, processes any employment and tax information, reviews records to ensure
correctness, writes paychecks to providers, and delivers paychecks or electronically
transfers funds to the consumer for distribution to providers or caregivers;
(5) "Provider" means:
(a) A person or agency licensed or otherwise permitted to render services eligible
for reimbursement under this program for whom the consumer is not the
employer of record; or
(b) A consumer-employed caregiver that renders services eligible for
reimbursement under this program for whom the consumer is the employer of
record;
(6) "Representative" means an uncompensated individual designated by the consumer
to assist in managing the consumer's budget allowance and needed services; and
(7) "Service advisor" means the person who provides technical assistance to a
consumer in meeting responsibilities under KRS 205.5605 to 205.5607.
Section 5. KRS 154.22-040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each year[,] the authority shall, under its Rural Economic Development Assistance
Program, on the basis of the final unemployment figures calculated by the
Department of Workforce Development in the Education and Labor Cabinet,
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
determine which counties have had a countywide rate of unemployment exceeding
the statewide unemployment rate of the Commonwealth in the most recent five (5)
consecutive calendar years, or which have had an average countywide rate of
unemployment exceeding the statewide unemployment rate of the Commonwealth
by two hundred percent (200%) in the most recent calendar year, and shall certify
those counties as qualified counties. A county not certified on the basis of final
unemployment figures may also be certified as a qualified county if the authority
determines the county is one (1) of the sixty (60) most distressed counties in the
Commonwealth based on the following criteria with equal weight given to each
criterion:
(a) The average countywide rate of unemployment in the most recent three (3)
consecutive calendar years, on the basis of final unemployment figures
calculated by the Department of Workforce Development in the Education
and Labor Cabinet;
(b) In each county the percentage of adults twenty-five (25) years of age and
older who have attained at least a high school education or equivalent, on the
basis of the most recent data available from the United States Department of
Commerce, Bureau of the Census; and
(c) Road quality, as quantified by the access within a county to roads ranked in
descending order from best quality to worst quality as follows: two (2) or
more interstate highways, one (1) interstate highway, a state four (4) lane
parkway, four (4) lane principal arterial access to an interstate highway, state
two (2) lane parkway and none of the preceding road types, as certified by the
Kentucky Transportation Cabinet to the authority.
If the authority determines that a county which has previously been certified as a
qualified county no longer meets the criteria of this subsection, the authority shall
decertify that county. The authority shall not provide inducements for any facilities
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
in that county and an approved company shall not be eligible for the inducements
offered by KRS 154.22-010 to 154.22-070 unless the tax incentive agreements
required herein are entered into by all parties prior to July 1 of the year following
the calendar year in which the authority decertified that county. In addition, the
authority shall certify coal-producing counties, not otherwise certified as qualified
counties in this subsection, for economic development projects involving the new
construction of electric generation facilities. A coal-producing county shall mean a
county in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that has produced coal upon which the
tax imposed under KRS 143.020 was paid at any time. For economic development
projects undertaken in a regional industrial park, as defined in KRS 42.4588, or in
an industrial park created pursuant to an interlocal agreement in which revenues are
shared as provided in KRS 65.210 to 65.300, where the physical boundaries of the
industrial park lie within two (2) or more counties of which at least one (1) of the
counties is a qualified county under this section, an eligible company undertaking
an economic development project within the physical boundaries of the industrial
park may be approved for the inducements under KRS 154.22-010 to 154.22-080.
(2) The authority shall establish the procedures and standards for the determination and
approval of eligible companies and their economic development projects by the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
The criteria for approval of eligible companies and economic development projects
shall include but not be limited to the creditworthiness of eligible companies; the
number of new jobs to be provided by an economic development project to
residents of the Commonwealth; and the likelihood of the economic success of the
economic development project.
(3) The economic development project shall involve a minimum investment of one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) by the eligible company and shall result in the
creation by the eligible company, within two (2) years from the date of the final
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
approval authorizing the economic development project, of a minimum of fifteen
(15) new full-time jobs at the site of the economic development project for
Kentucky residents to be employed by the eligible company and to be held by
persons subject to the personal income tax of the Commonwealth. The authority
may extend this two (2) year period upon the written application of an eligible
company requesting an extension.
(4) (a) Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall
compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees
whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:
1. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the
Commonwealth; or
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the county in
which the project is to be undertaken.
(b) If the base hourly wage calculated in paragraph (a)1. or 2. of this subsection is
less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage, then
the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal
minimum wage. However, for projects receiving preliminary approval of the
authority prior to July 1, 2008, the base hourly wage shall be one hundred
fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage existing on January 1,
2007. In addition to the applicable base hourly wage calculated above, the
eligible company shall provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen
percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wage; however, if the eligible
company does not provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent
(15%) of the applicable base hourly wage, the eligible company may qualify
under this section if it provides the employees hired by the eligible company
as a result of the economic development project total hourly compensation
equal to or greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the applicable
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
base hourly wage through increased hourly wages combined with employee
benefits.
(c) The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to eligible companies
which are nonprofit corporations established under KRS 273.163 to 273.387[
and whose employees are handicapped and sheltered workshop workers
employed at less than the established minimum wage as authorized by KRS
337.295].
For an eligible company, within a regional industrial park which lies within two (2)
or more counties, the calculation of the wage and benefit requirement shall be
determined by averaging the average county hourly wage for all counties within the
regional industrial park.
(5) No economic development project which will result in the replacement of
agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation facilities existing in the state
shall be approved by the authority; however, the authority may approve an
economic development project that:
(a) Rehabilitates an agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation facility:
1. Which has not been in operation for a period of ninety (90) or more
consecutive days;
2. For which the current occupant of the facility has published a notice of
closure so long as the eligible company intending to acquire the facility
is not an affiliate of the current occupant; or
3. The title to which is vested in other than the eligible company or an
affiliate of the eligible company and that is sold or transferred pursuant
to a foreclosure ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or an order
of a bankruptcy court of competent jurisdiction;
(b) Replaces an agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation facility
existing in the Commonwealth:
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
1. The title to which shall have been taken under the exercise of the power
of eminent domain, or the title to which shall be the subject of a
nonappealable judgment granting the authority to exercise the power of
eminent domain, in either event to the extent that normal operations
cannot be resumed at the facility within twelve (12) months; or
2. Which has been damaged or destroyed by fire or other casualty to the
extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility within
twelve (12) months; or
(c) Replaces an existing agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation
facility located in the same qualified county, and the existing agribusiness,
manufacturing, or electric generation facility to be replaced cannot be
expanded due to the unavailability of real estate at or adjacent to the
agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation facility to be replaced. Any
economic development project satisfying the requirements of this subsection
shall only be eligible for inducements to the extent of the expansion, and no
inducements shall be available for the equivalent of the agribusiness,
manufacturing, or electric generation facility to be replaced. No economic
development project otherwise satisfying the requirements of this subsection
shall be approved by the authority which results in a lease abandonment or
lease termination by the approved company without the consent of the lessor.
(6) With respect to each eligible company making an application to the authority for
inducements, and with respect to the economic development project described in
the application, the authority shall request materials and make inquiries of the
applicant as necessary or appropriate. Upon review of the application and
completion of initial inquiries, the authority may, by resolution, give its preliminary
approval by designating an eligible company as a preliminarily approved company
and authorizing the undertaking of the economic development project. After
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1754
preliminary approval, the authority may by final approval designate an eligible
company to be an approved company.
Section 6. Sections 1 to 5 of this Act may be cited as the Employees with
Disabilities Equal Pay Act.
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:14 AM Jacketed